Wyoming statutes. Title 39 Taxation and Revenue
Article 5. Sales from Remote Sellers

§ 39-15-501.
Sales from remote sellers.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any seller of tangible personal property, admissions or services which are subject to taxation under chapter 15 or 16 of this title who does not have a physical presence in this state shall remit sales tax and follow all applicable procedures and requirements of this chapter as if the seller had a physical presence in this state once the seller meets either of the following requirements for the current calendar year or the immediately preceding calendar year:

The seller’s gross revenue from the sale of tangible personal property, admissions or services delivered into this state exceeds one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00); or

The seller sold tangible personal property, admissions or services delivered into this state in two hundred (200) or more separate transactions.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the department may bring an action in this state to obtain a declaratory judgment that the obligation of the seller to remit sales tax under subsection (a) of this section is applicable and valid under state and federal law.

The filing of a declaratory judgment action under subsection (b) of this section operates as an injunction during the pendency of the action prohibiting the department or any other state entity from enforcing the obligation in subsection (a) of this section against any seller who does not affirmatively consent or otherwise remit sales tax on a voluntary basis.

If a court has entered a judgment against a seller or otherwise lifted or dissolved an injunction under this section, the department shall assess and apply the obligation under subsection (a) of this section from the date the judgment is entered or the injunction is lifted with respect to that seller.

A seller complying with this section voluntarily or pursuant to an action brought under this section may seek a recovery of taxes, penalties or interest by following the procedures established in this chapter. No claim for a refund or recovery of taxes, penalties or interest shall be granted on the basis that the seller lacked a physical presence in this state and complied with this section voluntarily while under the protection of an injunction granted under this section. Nothing in this subsection shall limit the ability of a seller to obtain a refund or recovery of taxes, penalties or interest for any other reason including mistake of fact or a miscalculation of the applicable tax.

No seller who remits sales tax voluntarily or otherwise under this section shall be liable to any person who claims that the sales tax has been over collected if any provision of this act is later deemed unlawful.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect the obligation of any purchaser in this state to remit use tax for any applicable transaction.

History.

2017 ch. 85, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2017, ch. 85, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2017.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2017, ch, 85, § 3, states as follows:
“This act shall not apply to any tax liability arising prior to the effective date of this act.”

§ 39-15-502.
Marketplace facilitators.

A marketplace facilitator shall be considered the vendor for each sale that the facilitator facilitates on its marketplace for a marketplace seller. Each marketplace facilitator shall:

Be responsible for all obligations imposed under chapters 15 and 16 of this title;

Keep records and information as may be required by the department to ensure proper collection and remittance of sales tax.

Subject to the limitations in W.S. 39-15-501(a), a marketplace facilitator shall collect and remit sales tax on all sales:

The marketplace facilitator makes on its own behalf; and

The marketplace facilitator facilitates on behalf of all marketplace sellers to customers in Wyoming. The marketplace facilitator shall collect and remit sales tax on sales facilitated by the marketplace facilitator and sold into Wyoming regardless of whether the marketplace seller has a sales tax permit or otherwise would have been required to collect sales tax if the sale had not been facilitated by the marketplace facilitator.

If a marketplace facilitator fails to collect or remit sales tax under subsection (b) of this section due to incorrect or insufficient information provided by the marketplace seller, the marketplace facilitator shall be relieved of liability for that failure to collect or remit the tax provided that the relief under this subsection shall not exceed five percent (5%) of the total sales tax due from sales made or facilitated in this state by the marketplace facilitator. If a marketplace facilitator is relieved of liability under this subsection, the marketplace seller or the purchaser shall be liable for any amount of uncollected, unpaid or unremitted tax due.

No relief under subsection (c) of this section shall be authorized for sales made by a marketplace seller who is affiliated with the marketplace facilitator. Entities are affiliated under this subsection if:

One (1) entity owns more than five percent (5%) of the other entity; or

Both entities are subject to the control of a common entity that owns more than five percent (5%) of each of the entities.

The department shall solely audit the marketplace facilitator for sales made by marketplace sellers but facilitated by the marketplace facilitator. The department shall not audit marketplace sellers except to the extent the marketplace facilitator seeks relief under subsection (c) of this section.

A class action shall not be maintained against a marketplace facilitator by or on behalf of purchasers arising from or in any way related to an overpayment of sales or use tax collected by the marketplace facilitator under this section, regardless of whether the action is characterized as a tax refund claim.

As used in this section:

“Marketplace” means any method through which a marketplace seller may sell or offer for sale tangible personal property, admissions or services which are subject to taxation under chapter 15 or 16 of this title for delivery into this state regardless of whether the marketplace seller has a physical presence in this state;

“Marketplace facilitator” means any person that facilitates a sale for a marketplace seller through a marketplace by:

Offering for sale by a marketplace seller, by any means, tangible personal property, admissions or services which are subject to taxation under chapter 15 or 16 of this title for delivery into this state; and

Directly, or indirectly through any agreement or arrangement with one (1) or more third parties, collecting payment from a purchaser and transmitting the payment to the marketplace seller, regardless of whether the person receives compensation or other consideration in exchange for facilitating the sale or providing any other service.

“Marketplace seller” means a vendor who sells or offers for sale tangible personal property, admissions or services which are subject to taxation under chapter 15 or 16 of this title for delivery into this state through a marketplace that is owned, operated or controlled by a marketplace facilitator.

History.

2019 ch. 41, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2019, ch. 41, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2019, ch. 41, § 3, provides: "No marketplace facilitator shall be required to collect or remit sales tax as provided in
W.S.

39-15-502

on any sale made prior to the effective date of this act. Nothing in this section shall be deemed to apply to any taxes that are required to be collected or remitted under
W.S.

39-15-501

prior to the effective date of this act.”